Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202048-3205
Work pursuant to request for bid or request for proposals; how treated.

The Facilitating Business Rapid Response to State Declared Disasters Act shall not grant exemptions authorized by the act to any out-of-state business performing work pursuant to a request for bid or request for proposals by a state agency or political subdivision.

Laws 2016, LB913, § 5.